Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin VOLUNTARY PRIVATE WELL WATER TESTING PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health, in consultation with the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota and interested nonprofit organizations, to develop a program that provides voluntary private well testing through local clinics and information about water safety, water treatment options, and private well owner water safety plans. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end